Utah statutes.
65A-2-2.   State land management planning procedures for natural and
cultural resources -- Assistance from other state agencies -- Division action.
The division:
(1)  shall develop planning procedures for natural and cultural resources on
state lands; and
(2)  may request other state agencies to generate technical data or other
management support services for the development and implementation of state
land management plans.
